Hawaii statutes.
§46-49 Interest on deposits. If any
money deposited by the director of finance, under the provisions of section
46-48, belongs to the waterworks funds, then any interest received on the same
shall be paid into and credited to the funds, and if any money so deposited
belongs to a bond fund, then any interest received on the same shall be paid
into and credited to the fund which provides for the payment of interest on
bonds. [L 1927, c 194, §2; RL 1935, §2318; am L 1935, c 67, §5; RL 1945, §6010;
RL 1955, §138-14; am L 1963, c 18, §1; HRS §46-49]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next